New York, session 2025-2026, A8991.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "New York 2 State Servicemember Right-to-Repair Act". 3 § 2. Section 17 of the military law, as amended by chapter 141 of the 4 laws of 1988, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 17. Purchase of military property. 1. Under the direction of the 6 governor, the adjutant general shall authorize the purchase of such 7 military property as may be required for the use of the organized mili- 8 tia. In extreme emergencies, however, the commanding officer of any 9 unit of the organized militia may purchase such necessities as are 10 required for the immediate use and care of [his] their command. A 11 report of such purchases shall be made forthwith to the adjutant gener- 12 al. 13 2. a. The adjutant general may not enter into a contract for the 14 procurement of goods or services unless the contractor agrees in writing 15 to provide the division of military and naval affairs and the United 16 States department of defense fair and reasonable access to all the 17 repair materials, including parts, tools, and information, used by the 18 manufacturer or provider or their authorized repair providers to diag- 19 nose, maintain, or repair the goods or services. 20 b. For the purposes of this subdivision, fair and reasonable access 21 shall mean terms and conditions that allow the division of military and 22 naval affairs to: (i) provide the repair materials to an authorized 23 contractor for the purpose of diagnosing, maintaining, or repairing the 24 goods or services; (ii) provision at prices, terms, and conditions that 25 are equivalent to the most favorable prices, terms, and conditions under EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13434-01-5 A. 8991 2 1 which the manufacturer or an authorized reseller or distributor offers 2 the part, tool, or information to an authorized repair provider, 3 accounting for any discount, rebate, convenient and timely means of 4 delivery, means of enabling fully restored and updated functionality, 5 rights of use, or other incentive or preference the manufacturer or an 6 authorized reseller or distributor offers to an authorized repair 7 provider; and (iii) if a manufacturer does not offer, directly or 8 through an authorized reseller or distributor, the part, tool, or infor- 9 mation to any authorized repair provider, then provision of such part, 10 tool, or information at prices, terms, and conditions that are otherwise 11 determined by the division of military and naval affairs to be fair and 12 reasonable in accordance with this section. 13 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.